data/tr_reference.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ѕ mak turası/ІѝѵФчѤѢхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turasın mak
SFX ѕ mak turasınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turayım mak
SFX ѕ mak turcasına mak
SFX ѕ mak turdu mak
SFX ѕ mak turduk mak
SFX ѕ mak turduk/ФчСхжЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turduğ/ЁћЩпЯгкнЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turdukça mak
SFX ѕ mak turdular mak
SFX ѕ mak turdularsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turdum mak
SFX ѕ mak turdun mak
SFX ѕ mak turdunuz mak
SFX ѕ mak turduysa mak
SFX ѕ mak turduysak mak
SFX ѕ mak turduysalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turduysam mak
SFX ѕ mak turduysan mak
SFX ѕ mak turduysanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turken mak
SFX ѕ mak turlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turlardı mak
SFX ѕ mak turlardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turlarken mak
SFX ѕ mak turlarmış mak
SFX ѕ mak turlarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turma mak
SFX ѕ mak turma/ІѝѵФчѤѢхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadık/ФчСхжЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadığ/ЀћШоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadıkça mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadılarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadıysa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadıysak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadıysalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadıysam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadıysan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmadıysanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmak/ЄЀћФчШСхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaksızın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmakta mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktadır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktadırlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktalardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktalarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktansa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktasın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktasınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaydı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaydık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaydılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaydım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaydın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaydınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktayken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaymış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaymışlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaymışsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaymışsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaymışım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaymışız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaysa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaysak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaysam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaysan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktaysanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktayslar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktayım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaktayız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıdırlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalılardı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalılardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalılarmış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalılarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalısın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalısındır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalısınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalısınızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıydı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıydık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıydılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıydım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıydın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıydınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıyken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıymış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıymışlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıymışsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıymışsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıymışım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıymışız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıysa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıysak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıysam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıysan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıysanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıyslar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıyım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıyımdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıyız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmalıyızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmama mak
SFX ѕ mak turmama/ІѝѵФчѤѢхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamadan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamak/ЄЀћФчШСхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaksızın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamakta mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktadır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktadırlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktalardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktalarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktansa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktasın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktasınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaydı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaydık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaydılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaydım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaydın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaydınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktayken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaymış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaymışlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaymışsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaymışsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaymışım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaymışız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaysa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaysak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaysam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaysan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktaysanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktayslar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktayım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaktayız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalılardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalılarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalısın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalısındır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalısınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalısınızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıydı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıydık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıydılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıydım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıydın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıydınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıyken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıysa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıysak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıysam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıysan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıysanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıyslar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıyım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıyımdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıyız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamalıyızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamayıncaya mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamaz/ЄЀћФчШСхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamazken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamış/ЄЀћФчШСхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlardı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlardık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlardılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlardım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlardın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlardınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlık/ФчСхжЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışlığ/ЀћШоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsındır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışsınızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamıştı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamıştık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamıştılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamıştım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamıştın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamıştınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamıştır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışımdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmamışızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasalardı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasana mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasanıza mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaydı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaydık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaydılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaydım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaydın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaydınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaymış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaymışlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaymışsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaymışsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaymışım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasaymışız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmasınlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabildi mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabildik mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabildik/ХшТцзѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabildiğ/ЂќЪрадлтЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabildikçe mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilebilirlik mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilebilirlik/ХшТцзѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilebilirliğ/ЂќЪрадлтЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilecakken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilecek mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilecek/ХшТцзѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabileceğ/ЂќЪрадлтЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabileli mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilemeden mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilen mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilen/ЙЂќХшЪТцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilerek mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilerken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilesi mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilesi/ЛџѶХшѦѣцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilici mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilici/ЛџѶХшѦѣцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilince mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilinceye mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilip mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilir mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirdi mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirdik mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirdim mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirdin mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirdiniz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirim mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliriz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirler mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirlerdi mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirlik mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirlik/ХшТцзѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirliğ/ЂќЪрадлтЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirmiş mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirse mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirsin mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilirsiniz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyor mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyordu mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyorlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyormuş mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyorsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyorsun mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyorsunuz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyorum mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliyoruz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliş mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabiliş/ЙЂќХшЪТцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilme mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilme/ЛџѶХшѦѣцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmeden mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmek mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmek/ЙЂќХшЪТцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmeksizin mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmeyinceye mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmez mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmez/ЙЂќХшЪТцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmezken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmiş mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmiş/ЙЂќХшЪТцзрадлтѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmişlik mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmişlik/ХшТцзѡ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilmişliğ/ЂќЪрадлтЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayabilse mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacak/ФчСхжЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacağ/ЀћШоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacakken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaklar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaklardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaklarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacakmış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacakmışlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacakmışsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacakmışsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacakmışım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacakmışız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksındır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaksınızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaktı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaktık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaktılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaktım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaktın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaktınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacaktır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacağım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacağımdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacağız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayacağızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayalı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayalım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayamadan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayan/ЄЀћФчШСхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayarak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayarken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayası mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayası/ІѝѵФчѤѢхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayayım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayıcı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayıcı/ІѝѵФчѤѢхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayınca mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayıncaya mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayıp mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayırken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmayış/ЄЀћФчШСхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaz/ЄЀћФчШСхжоЮвийЎ mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazdı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazdık mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazdılar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazdım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazdın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazdınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazlardı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazlardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazlarken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazlarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazmış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazmışlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazmışsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazmışsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazmışım mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazmışız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsın mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsındır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsınız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmazsınızdır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmaztır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyor mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyordu mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorduk mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyordum mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyordun mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyordunuz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyordur mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorken mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorlardı mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorlardır mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorlarmış mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorlarsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyormuş mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyormuşlar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyormuşsun mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyormuşsunuz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyormuşum mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyormuşuz mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsa mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsak mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsalar mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsam mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsan mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsanız mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsun mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsundur mak
SFX ѕ mak turmuyorsunuz mak
